Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2508
Commission; executive board; purpose; members; powers.

(1) For the purpose of administration of the Commission on Indian Affairs during the interim between its regular quarterly meetings, there is hereby established an executive board of the Commission on Indian Affairs consisting of the chairperson of the commission, two members representing the reservations or tribal service areas as defined in section 43-1503, one member representing the urban areas, and one member who represents the western Nebraska areas or is the member at large.

(2) The executive board shall have the authority to enter into contracts for consultation services, supplies, and equipment if the amount contracted for does not exceed the sum of two thousand dollars in any one contract, and to supervise all programs relating to the affairs of Indian tribes instituted and authorized by the commission.

Laws 1976, LB 174, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1219.01;

Laws 1999, LB 475, § 9.